src/morphology/stems/adj.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_MÄRKÄ

0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

0  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;

0:k  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;

0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:kä  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

+Dial:j  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;

+Dial:jä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;

0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;

0:e  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;

+Dial:j  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

+Dial:je  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;


!!  p:m is missing from this a, ä stems.

LEXICON ADJ_KULTA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 t~l a:e comparative
!!€  kulta: kulta+A+Sg+Nom # dear
!!€  kultaa: kulta+A+Sg+Par
!!€  kultana: kulta+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  kullassa: kulta+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  kultina: kulta+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  kullissa: kulta+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  kultien: kulta+A+Pl+Gen
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:la  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:l  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:la  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:l  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  T:l and t:n are missing from this a stem and t:l from ä stem.

LEXICON ADJ_LÄNTÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 t~l ä:e comparative
!!€  lyhyenläntä: lyhyenläntä+A+Sg+Nom # shorty
!!€  lyhyenläntää: lyhyenläntä+A+Sg+Par
!!€  lyhyenläntänä: lyhyenläntä+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  lyhyenlännässä: lyhyenläntä+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  lyhyenläntinä: lyhyenläntä+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  lyhyenlännissä: lyhyenläntä+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  lyhyenläntien: lyhyenläntä+A+Pl+Gen
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:nä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:n  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:nä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:n  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_TURTA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 t~r a:e comparative
!!€  turta: turta+A+Sg+Nom # numb
!!€  turtaa: turta+A+Sg+Par
!!€  turtana: turta+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  turrassa:  turta+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  turtina: turta+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  turrissa: turta+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  turtien: turta+A+Pl+Gen
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ra  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:r  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:ra  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ra  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  K:j is missing.

LEXICON ADJ_HAPERA
!!  Certain trisyllabic or longer a stems allow a lot of allomorphs and both
!!  a : o : 0 variations:
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 11 back
!!€  hapera: hapera+A+Sg+Nom # brittle
!!€  haperia: hapera+A+Pl+Par
!!€  haperoita: hapera+A+Pl+Par
!!€  haperien: hapera+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  haperoiden: hapera+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  haperoitten: hapera+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  haperiin: hapera+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  haperoihin: hapera+A+Pl+Ill
!!  Also less commonly
!!€  haperojen: hapera+A+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€  haperoja: hapera+A+Use/Rare+Pl+Par
!!€  haperain: hapera+A+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare
0:a  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;
+Use/Rare:o  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
+Use/Rare:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;

LEXICON ADJ_HÖPPÄNÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 11 front
!!€  höppänä: höppänä+A+Sg+Nom # senile
!!€  höppänää: höppänä+A+Sg+Par
!!€  höppänänä: höppänä+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  höppänässä: höppänä+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  höppäninä: höppänä+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  höppänien: höppänä+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  höppäniin: höppänä+A+Pl+Ill
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_HARMAJA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 12
!!€  harmaja: harmaja+A+Sg+Nom # ?
!!€  harmajaa: harmaja+A+Sg+Par
!!€  harmajana: harmaja+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  harmajoina: harmaja+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  harmajoita: harmaja+A+Pl+Par
0:a  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_LATUSKA
!!  Certain trisyllabic or longer a stems allow a lot of allomorphs and both
!!  a : o : 0 variations:
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 12++
!!€  latuska: latuska+A+Sg+Nom # flat
!!€  latuskoita: latuska+A+Pl+Par
!!€  latuskoja: latuska+A+Pl+Par
!!€  latuskoiden: latuska+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  latuskoitten: latuska+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  latuskojen: latuska+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  latuskoihin: latuska+A+Pl+Ill
0:a  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !Special illative gradation in a stems

LEXICON ADJ_HAILAKKA
!!  The a : o stem variation combines with trisyllabic class of special illatives
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 14 back
!!€  hailakka: hailakka+A+Sg+Nom # pale
!!€  hailakkoina: hailakka+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  hailakoissa: hailakka+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  hailakkoihin: hailakka+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  hailakoihin: hailakka+A+Pl+Ill
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 14 front
!!€  räväkkä: räväkkä+A+Sg+Nom # flamboyant
!!€  räväköihin: räväkkä+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  räväkköihin: räväkkä+A+Pl+Ill
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:kö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJECTIVE
hailakka+A:hailak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
haljakka+A:haljak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
hanakka+A:hanak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
hanakka+A:hanak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
hapera+A:haper  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
harmaja+A:harmaj  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
hatara+A:hatar  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
helakka+A:helak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
hervakka+A:hervak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
hutera+A:huter  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
höppänä+A:höppän  ADJ_HÖPPÄNÄ  ;
itara+A:itar  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
jymäkkä+A:jymäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
jämäkkä+A:jämäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
kalvakka+A:kalvak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
kanalja+A:kanalj  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
kihara+A:kihar  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
kikkara+A:kikkar  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
kikkara+A:kikkar  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
kikkara+A:kikkar  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
kikkara+A:kikkar  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
kimakka+A:kimak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
kinttana+A:kinttan  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
kipakka+A:kipak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
kippura+A:kippur  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
kirpakka+A:kirpak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
kiverä+A:kiver  ADJ_HÖPPÄNÄ  ;
kuivakka+A:kuivak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
kukkura+A:kukkur  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
kulta+A:kul  ADJ_KULTA  ;
kupura+A:kupur  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
kuulakka+A:kuulak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
lattana+A:lattan  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
latuska+A:latusk  ADJ_LATUSKA  ;
liehakka+A:liehak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
likomärkä+A:likomär  ADJ_MÄRKÄ  ;
likomärkä+A:likomär  ADJ_MÄRKÄ  ;
litimärkä+A:litimär  ADJ_MÄRKÄ  ;
litimärkä+A:liti#mär  ADJ_MÄRKÄ  ;
littana+A:littan  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
lullukka+A:lulluk  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
luonnonkihara+A:luonnonkihar  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
luonnonkihara+A:luonnon#kihar  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
lupsakka+A:lupsak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
luulaja+A:luulaj  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
lyhyenläntä+A:lyhyenlän  ADJ_LÄNTÄ  ;
läpimärkä+A:läpimär  ADJ_MÄRKÄ  ;
läpimärkä+A:läpi#mär  ADJ_MÄRKÄ  ;
lättänä+A:lättän  ADJ_HÖPPÄNÄ  ;
märkä+A:mär  ADJ_MÄRKÄ  ;
märkä+A:mär  ADJ_MÄRKÄ  ;
möräkkä+A:möräk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
napakka+A:napak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
nasakka+A:nasak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
navakka+A:navak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
näpsäkkä+A:näpsäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
näpäkkä+A:näpäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
pullukka+A:pulluk  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
punakka+A:punak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
purppura+A:purppur  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
pönäkkä+A:pönäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
railakka+A:railak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
rapsakka+A:rapsak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
rasakka+A:rasak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
ravakka+A:ravak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
rehvakka+A:rehvak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
remakka+A:remak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
riehakka+A:riehak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
rivakka+A:rivak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
ropakka+A:ropak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
ruskeanpurppura+A:ruskeanpurppur  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
ruskeanpurppura+A:ruskean#purppur  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
rutakka+A:rutak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
rämäkkä+A:rämäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
rätväkkä+A:rätväk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
räväkkä+A:räväk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
römäkkä+A:römäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
sikkara+A:sikkar  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
sirpakka+A:sirpak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
sivakka+A:sivak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
solakka+A:solak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
sujakka+A:sujak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
supukka+A:supuk  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
sutjakka+A:sutjak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
syndaktylia+A:syndaktyli  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
sähäkkä+A:sähäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
säkkärä+A:säkkär  ADJ_HÖPPÄNÄ  ;
tanakka+A:tanak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
terhakka+A:terhak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
tolvana+A:tolvan  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
tomera+A:tomer  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
topakka+A:topak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
tuliterä+A:tuliter  ADJ_HÖPPÄNÄ  ;
tumpula+A:tumpul  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
turta+A:tur  ADJ_TURTA  ;
tömäkkä+A:tömäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
valakka+A:valak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
vanttera+A:vantter  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
veiterä+A:veiter  ADJ_HÖPPÄNÄ  ;
violetinpurppura+A:violetinpurppur  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
violetinpurppura+A:violetin#purppur  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
vähäläntä+A:vähälän  ADJ_LÄNTÄ  ;
vähänläntä+A:vähänlän  ADJ_LÄNTÄ  ;
ärhäkkä+A:ärhäk  ADJ_RÄVÄKKÄ  ;
